Georgia, session 2025_26, HB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Educational Opportunity Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 6 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
"Quality Basic Education Act," is amended by revising Code Section 20-2-130, relating to
short title, as follows:
"20-2-130.
(a) This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Quality Basic Education Act.'
(b) As used in this article:
H. B. 245
- 1 -

LC 49 2157
(1) 'Student in foster care' means a student enrolled in a public school who is placed in
a foster family home, child care institution, or another substitute care setting approved
by the Department of Human Services or Division of Family and Children Services.
(2) 'Student living in poverty' means a student enrolled in a public school who meets one
or more of the following criteria:
(A) Lives in a family unit directly certified to be receiving Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits;
(B) Lives in a family unit directly certified to be receiving Temporary Assistance for
Needy Families (TANF) benefits;
(C) Is a student in foster care; or
(D) Is a student without stable housing.
(3) 'Student without stable housing' means a student enrolled in a public school who
meets the definition of the term 'homeless children and youths' under the federal
McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, codified at 42 U.S.C. Section 11301, et seq.,
in force and effect on January 1, 2025."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by adding a new paragraph to subsection (b) of Code Section
20-2-161, relating to quality basic education formula, to read as follows:
"(19) Students living in poverty program . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . 1.7500
weight and
1 to 15
ratio"
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 245
- 2 -